Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202621-1749
Meetings.

The annual meeting and any special meeting of the members of the credit union shall be held in accordance with the bylaws. A special meeting of the members of the credit union may be called by the members or by the board of directors as provided in the bylaws. A credit union shall give notice of the time and place or virtual conferencing platform by which members can participate and interact for any meeting of its members. In the case of a special meeting, the notice of such special meeting shall state the purpose of the meeting and the notice shall be given at least ten calendar days prior to the date of such special meeting.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 49;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 68.